Indiana, session 2026, SB205.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-4-616.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 616.1. (a) The following
definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Affordable housing" means a residential dwelling unit
reserved for a household whose income does not exceed eighty
percent (80%) of the median income for the area as set out by
the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development.
(2) "Religious developer" means a religious institution or any
property developer working on behalf of a religious
institution.
(3) "Religious institution" means a:
(A) bona fide church;
(B) religious denomination; or
(C) religious organization;
determined by the Internal Revenue Service to be tax exempt
2026 IN 205—LS 6871/DI 129


under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
zoning ordinance must allow for residential housing developed by
a religious developer as a permitted use in all residential or
commercial zones if each of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The development is located on property owned by the
religious institution.
(2) The development has been approved by the legislative
body of the unit with jurisdiction over the property where the
development is to be located.
(3) The development exclusively contains affordable housing.
(4) The religious developer has obtained all other permits,
including building permits, as required by law.
(c) A zoning ordinance adopted before July 1, 2026, is void to
the extent the ordinance conflicts with this section. However, this
section does not apply to or affect any application for a permit (as
defined in section 1109(f) of this chapter) with regard to the
development of residential housing by a religious developer that is:
(1) submitted to a unit before July 1, 2026; and
(2) pending approval or has been approved as of July 1, 2026;
as set forth in section 1109 of this chapter.
2026 IN 205—LS 6871/DI 129